Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Article 1. Generally
§ 27-14-105.
Action against third party; notice; subrogation; legal representation; payment under reservation of rights; actions by department.

If an employee covered by this act receives an injury under circumstances creating a legal liability in some person other than the employer to pay damages, the employee if engaged in work for his employer at the time of the injury is not deprived of any compensation to which he is entitled under this act. He may also pursue his remedy at law against the third party or the coemployee to the extent permitted by W.S. 27-14-104(a). Except as provided by subsections (b), (e) and (f) of this section, if the employee recovers from the third party or the coemployee in any manner including judgment, compromise, settlement or release, the state is entitled to be reimbursed for all payments made, or to be made, to or on behalf of the employee under this act but not to exceed one-third (1/3) of the total proceeds of the recovery without regard to the types of damages alleged in the third-party action. Any recovery by the state shall be reduced pro rata for attorney fees and costs in the same proportion as the employee is liable for fees and costs. All money received by the state under this section shall be credited to the worker’s compensation account and considered in computing the employer’s experience rating.

The director and the attorney general shall be served by certified mail return receipt requested with a copy of the complaint filed in any suit initiated pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. Service of the complaint on the director and attorney general is a jurisdictional requirement in order to maintain the suit. The director and the attorney general shall be notified in writing by certified mail return receipt requested of any judgment, compromise, settlement or release entered into by an employee. Before offering settlement to an employee, a third party or its insurer shall notify the state of the proposed settlement and give the state fifteen (15) days after receipt of such notice in which to object. If notice of proposed settlement is not provided, the state is entitled to initiate an independent action against the third party or its insurer for all payments made to and any amount reserved for or on behalf of the employee under this act. If there is a settlement, compromise or release entered into by the parties in claims against a person other than the employer, the attorney general representing the director shall be made a party in all such negotiations for settlement, compromise or release. The attorney general and the director, for purposes of facilitating compromise and settlement, may in a proper case authorize acceptance by the state of less than the state’s claim for reimbursement. The proceeds of any judgment, settlement, compromise or release are encumbered by a continuing lien in favor of the state to the extent of the total amount of the state’s claim for reimbursement under this section and for all current and future benefits under this act. The lien shall remain in effect until the state is paid the amount authorized under this section. In addition the person paying the settlement remains liable to the state for the state’s claim unless the state through the attorney general signs the release prior to payment of an agreed settlement.

If the injury causes the death of the employee, the rights and remedies in this section inure to and the obligations are binding upon the personal representative of the deceased employee for the benefit of his dependents.

Any attorney who fails to notify the director and attorney general of any settlement or fails to ensure the state receives its share of the proceeds of any settlement or judgment under subsection (a) of this section shall be reported to the grievance committee of the Wyoming state bar.

At any time before the statute of limitation bars an employee or his estate from commencing a claim for personal injury or wrongful death, and upon the unsolicited written request of the employee or estate, the department may commence such an action on behalf of the employee or his estate. From any amounts recovered under this subsection, the state is entitled to an amount equal to all sums awarded as benefits to the employee or his estate and all anticipated future medical costs. Any excess recovery shall be paid to the injured employee or his estate.

The department or employer shall have an additional six (6) month limitation period beyond the date on which the employee or his estate is barred under the statute of limitations from commencing a claim for personal injury or wrongful death, in which to commence such an action on behalf of the employee or his estate. From any amounts recovered under this subsection, the state is entitled to an amount equal to all sums awarded as benefits to the employee or his estate, all anticipated future medical costs and all costs of litigation. Any excess recovery shall be paid to the injured employee or his estate.

For purposes of subsections (e) and (f) of this section, nothing in this section prohibits any third party from reimbursing the worker’s compensation account for medical or temporary total disability costs without prejudice prior to any judgment, settlement or release.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1995, ch. 183, § 1; 2009, ch. 156, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a), added the second-to-last sentence.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

Legislative intent. —

This section is designed to protect the state's lien rights in the event of settlement or judgment in favor of the injured worker in actions involving third parties or others. Streeter v. Amerequip Corp., 968 F. Supp. 624, 1997 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 9464 (D. Wyo. 1997).

The legislature has the power to attach conditions to the payments to be made under the Workmen's (now Worker's) Compensation Law

even though a condition affects an amount recovered from a third party. Brown v. State, 79 Wyo. 355, 334 P.2d 502,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1959); Wyoming State Treasurer ex rel. Worker's Compensation Div. v. McIntosh, 557 P.2d 743,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 229

(Wyo. 1976); Stephenson v. Mitchell, 569 P.2d 95,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 317

(Wyo. 1977).

The matter of the workmen's compensation schedule is one for the legislature, not the courts. Stephenson v. Mitchell, 569 P.2d 95,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 317

(Wyo. 1977).

Meaning of recovery generally. —

What is meant by recovery? This harks back to the phrase “in the event that such employee recovered from such [third] person.” It cannot mean the amount paid to the employee from the former industrial accident fund nor can it mean the amount restored to the former industrial accident fund as a result of a proceeding. The cost of recovery is necessarily the cost incident to the recovery of a judgment in or settlement of a damage action or claim against the third party, for it is only in such an action in which any such cost as 331/3 percent would be involved, and the limitation that not to exceed 331/3 percent of the recovery be deducted from that amount means that 331/3 percent of the amount recovered is the maximum amount which may in any event be deducted from the amounts paid to or on behalf of the employee by the former industrial accident fund rather than that 331/3 percent of the amount paid from the former industrial accident fund be deducted from such payments. Brown v. State, 79 Wyo. 355, 334 P.2d 502,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1959).

Meaning of recovery costs to be deducted. —

The costs to be deducted from payments made to the employee shall not exceed 331/3 percent of the amount recovered. This does not mean that in all cases there should be a flat deduction of the whole 331/3 percent, but is a limitation of the amount which the court may deduct. Brown v. State, 79 Wyo. 355, 334 P.2d 502,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1959).

Cost of “recovery or collection” includes attorney's fees.

Wyoming State Treasurer ex rel. Worker's Compensation Div. v. McIntosh, 557 P.2d 743,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 229

(Wyo. 1976).

No attorney's lien against sums to be refunded to state. —

An attorney, under the general attorneys' lien statute, §

29-1-102

, cannot enforce his lien against those sums set aside by statute out of third-party damages which the legislature, in this section, has specifically mandated will be refunded to the state. Wyoming State Treasurer ex rel. Worker's Compensation Div. v. McIntosh, 557 P.2d 743,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 229

(Wyo. 1976); Stephenson v. Mitchell, 569 P.2d 95,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 317

(Wyo. 1977).

Since the state may not be a party to actions which seek to recover damages from negligent third persons, the state is not, therefore, subrogated to the rights of the injured employee in any such litigation. For this reason there cannot be an express or an implied contract requiring the state to pay the employee's attorney's fees for collecting the money which, under the statute, must be reimbursed to the state as refund for benefits paid. Wyoming State Treasurer ex rel. Worker's Compensation Div. v. McIntosh, 557 P.2d 743,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 229

(Wyo. 1976).

The industrial accident fund, administered by the state workmen's compensation department, could not be charged attorney's fees by an employee coming under the provisions of the Worker's Compensation Act making a successful recovery in a third-party action under the provisions of former § 27-54, Stephenson v. Mitchell, 569 P.2d 95,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 317

(Wyo. 1977).

Employee not entitled to double recovery. —

See Jackson v. Wyoming State Treas. ex. rel. Workmen's Comp. Dep't, 521 P.2d 571,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 196

(Wyo. 1974).

According to this section, the employee cannot (within the limits hereafter mentioned) receive the benefit of the amount of compensation allowed to him twice — once from the former industrial accident fund and again from a third person, although he may retain any amount recovered from a third person over and above the amount of compensation allowed him by the state from the former industrial accident fund after subtracting therefrom the amounts authorized therefor as the former industrial accident fund's share of the costs of the recovery from the third party. Brown v. State, 79 Wyo. 355, 334 P.2d 502,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1959).

Settlement with third party construed as not barring compensation.—

In an action by the state for reimbursement from an employee for the amount paid by a third party to the employee, a demurrer by the state to the employee's answer should have been overruled where the answer set out the words of the settlement with the third party, which on its face showed that it ran both to the employee and his wife and that payment was received from the third party for injuries for which the employee had not received compensation. State ex rel. Morgan v. Moravetz, 78 Wyo. 100, 319 P.2d 527,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1957).

Wrongful death benefits subject to reimbursement. —

Wrongful death benefits received by the wife of a deceased worker in a suit initiated after benefits were received under this chapter were subject to the reimbursement and lien provisions of this section and were not protected by the wrongful death provision of §

1-38-102

, which shields wrongful death proceeds passing to surviving relatives from the “debts of the decedent.” West v. Wyoming State Treasurer, 822 P.2d 1269,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 193

(Wyo. 1991) (decided under former § 27-12-104).

Third person's negligence. —

Award should be payable in case of a third person's negligence, when that negligence is one of well known hazards of the business within the reasonable scope of a named employment. Baldwin v. Byrne, 53 Wyo. 519, 86 P.2d 1095,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(1939).

Former § 27-54 not unconstitutional. —

Former § 27-54, W.S. 1957, under which it was held that the state industrial accident fund would not share the expense of attorney's fees in third-party recovery by an injured workman, was not in violation of art. X, § 4, Wyo. Const., authorizing the creation of workmen's compensation. Stephenson v. Mitchell, 569 P.2d 95,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 317

(Wyo. 1977).

As to right of recovery against coemployee under former law,

see Markle v. Williamson, 518 P.2d 621,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 1974); Fraley v. Worthington, 385 F. Supp. 605, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 11856 (D. Wyo. 1974).

Indemnity contract entered into between employer and contractorenforceable by contractor. —

A contract entered into between an employer and a contractor, pertaining to a well for oil or gas, which provided that the employer would indemnify the contractor for all loss it might sustain as a result of the employer's work under the contract except such loss as might be caused by the sole negligence of the contractor, was enforceable by the contractor, who was sued by the employer's employee — who suffered injury during the course of his employment and was granted worker's compensation — against the employer, to the extent of any damage suffered because of the sole or concurrent negligence of the employer. Cities Serv. Co. v. Northern Prod. Co., 705 P.2d 321,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 543

(Wyo. 1985).

Jurisdictional requirement of service. —

“Maintain” in § 27-14-105(b) means that the suit may be filed, but it may not be continued toward judgment until the Wyoming Attorney General and the Director of the Wyoming Worker's Compensation Division have been served. Terex Corp. v. Hough, 2002 WY 112, 50 P.3d 317,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 2002), reh'g denied,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. Aug. 13, 2002).

Service of a copy of the complaint on the Wyoming Attorney General and the Director of the Wyoming Worker's Compensation Division under § 27-14-105(b) may be made within 60 days of the filing of the complaint and to the extent Makinen v. PM P.C., 893 P.2d 1149,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 1995), overruled, Terex Corp. v. Hough, 2002 WY 112, 50 P.3d 317,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 2002).

Compliance. —

Failure of an injured employee who had received benefits under the state's worker's compensation laws to comply with the notice and service requirements of this section when filing a diversity suit against a manufacturer in district court did not deprive the court of subject matter jurisdiction; the state was not prejudiced by the employee's failure, and the employee subsequently took steps to comply and amended her complaint to include allegations of compliance, to which the defendant responded. Streeter v. Amerequip Corp., 968 F. Supp. 624, 1997 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 9464 (D. Wyo. 1997).

Where public employee did not serve copies of her personal injury complaint on the state attorney general or the director of the department of employment in the manner required by Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-14-105(b) , the complaint was barred by the statute of limitation, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-3-105

because service was not perfected until after expiration of the four year statute of limitations. However, the savings statute, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-3-118

, applied to allow the employee to refile the action.
Haney v. Cribbs, 2006 WY 158, 148 P.3d 1118,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 180

(Wyo. 2006).

Applied

in

Boyd v. Nation, 909 P.2d 323,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1996).

Cited

in

Nixon v. State, 994 P.2d 324,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. 1999); Knight v. Estate of McCoy, 2015 WY 9,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Jan. 14, 2015).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Uninsured Motorist Act: A Regulatory Reconcilation of Mandated Coverages with the Standard Uninsured Motorist Endorsement,” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 213 (1976).

For case note, “Exclusivity Provisions of the Worker's Compensation Act as a Bar to Third-Party Actions Against Employers, Pan American Petroleum Corp. v. Maddux Well Service, 586 P.2d 1220,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 244

(Wyo. 1978),” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 587 (1979).

For case note, “Worker's Compensation — Constitutionality of Wyoming's Co-employee Immunity Statute under Article 10, Section 4, of the Wyoming Constitution.Meyer v. Kendig, 641 P.2d 1235,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 310

(Wyo. 1982),” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 355 (1983).

For article, “Reinstating Wyoming’s
Joint and Several Liability Paradigm: Protecting
Wyoming’s Workforce, Their
Families
And The Wyoming Worker’s Compensation
Fund From Uncompensated Injuries And Deaths”, see 8 Wyo. L. Rev. 87 (2008).

ARTICLE: Damned if You do, Damned if You Don't: A Contextual Analysis of Co-Employee Liability and Wyoming Workers' Compensation Subrogation, 16 Wyo. L. Rev. 415 (2016).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Modern status of effect of state workmen's compensation act on right of third-person tortfeasor to contribution or indemnity from employer of injured or killed workman, 100 ALR3d 350.

Employer's right of action for loss of services or the like against third person tortiously killing or injuring employee, 4 ALR4th 504.

Workers' compensation immunity as extending to one owning controlling interest in employer corporation, 30 ALR4th 948.

Liability of employer with regard to inherently dangerous work for injuries to employees of independent contractor, 34 ALR4th 914.

Right of health or accident insurer to intervene in workers' compensation proceeding to recover benefits previously paid to claimant or beneficiary, 38 ALR4th 355.

Third-party tortfeasor's right to have damages recovered by employee reduced by amount of employee's workers' compensation benefits, 43 ALR4th 849.

Willful, wanton or reckless conduct of coemployee as ground of liability despite bar of workers' compensation law, 57 ALR4th 888.

Prejudicial effect of bringing to jury's attention fact that plaintiff in personal injury or death action is entitled to workers' compensation benefits, 69 ALR4th 131.

“Dual capacity doctrine” as basis for employee's recovery for medical malpractice from company medical personnel, 73 ALR4th 115.

Workers' compensation: third-party tort liability of corporate officer to injured workers, 76 ALR4th 365.

Right of workers' compensation insurer or employer paying to a workers' compensation fund, on the compensable death of an employee with no dependents, to indemnity or subrogation from proceeds of wrongful death action brought against third-party tortfeasor, 7 ALR5th 969.

Library References.

Larson's Workers' Compensation Law § 116.01D (Matthew Bender).

§ 27-14-106.
Minor employee to be free of any legal disability.

A minor shall be deemed free of any legal disability for the purposes of this act and no other person has any cause of action or right to compensation for his injury except as expressly provided in this act.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Workers' compensation statute as barring illegally employed minor's tort action, 77 ALR4th 844.

Right of workers' compensation insurer or employer paying to a workers' compensation fund, on the compensable death of an employee with no dependents, to indemnity or subrogation from proceeds of wrongful death action brought against third-party tortfeasor, 7 ALR5th 969.

§ 27-14-107.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 121, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1990, ch. 90, § 1, related to the determination of filing dates and time periods.